District of Columbia statutes.
29-604.09

Continuation of partnership beyond definite term or particular undertaking.

(a)

If a partnership for a definite term or particular undertaking is continued, without an express agreement, after the expiration of the term or completion of the undertaking, the rights and duties of the partners shall remain the same as they were at the expiration or completion, so far as is consistent with a partnership at will.

(b)

If the partners, or those of them who habitually acted in the business during the term or undertaking, continue the business without any settlement or liquidation of the partnership, they shall be presumed to have agreed that the partnership will continue.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(f)(4)(C), 59 DCR 13171
1981 Ed., § 41-154.6.
2001 Ed., § 33-104.06.
2001 Ed., § 29-604.06.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 redesignated former § 20-604.06 as § 29-604.09.

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 406 of the Uniform Partnership Act (1997 Act).

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.